Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB419.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 1369.5. Special plates for recipients of commendation medals.(a) Issuance.--Upon application of a person who is a recipient of the Joint Service Commendation Medal, Army Commendation Medal, Navy and Marine Corps Commendation Medal, Air and Space Commendation Medal or Coast Guard Commendation Medal, accompanied by a fee of $26 which shall be in addition to the registration fee and any documentation the department requires, the department shall issue to the person a special registration plate designating the vehicle so licensed as belonging to a person who is a recipient of the Joint Service Commendation Medal, Army Commendation Medal, Navy and Marine 12345678910111213141516171819 Corps Commendation Medal, Air and Space Commendation Medal or Coast Guard Commendation Medal.(b) Limitation.--A special registration plate under this section may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.(c) Design.--The department shall design and produce the special registration plate under this section to display the Joint Service Commendation Medal, Army Commendation Medal, Navy and Marine Corps Commendation Medal, Air and Space Commendation Medal or Coast Guard Commendation Medal and the words "Joint Service Commendation Medal," "Army Commendation Medal," "Navy and Marine Corps Commendation Medal," "Air and Space Commendation Medal" or "Coast Guard Commendation Medal" at the bottom of each plate.§ 1369.6. Special plates for recipients of achievement medals.(a) Issuance.--Upon application of a person who is a recipient of the Joint Service Achievement Medal, Army Achievement Medal, Navy and Marine Corps Achievement Medal, Air and Space Achievement Medal or Coast Guard Achievement Medal, accompanied by a fee of $26 which shall be in addition to the registration fee and any documentation the department requires, the department shall issue to the person a special registration plate designating the vehicle so licensed as belonging to a person who is a recipient of the Joint Service Achievement Medal, Army Achievement Medal, Navy and Marine Corps Achievement Medal, Air and Space Achievement Medal or Coast Guard Achievement Medal.(b) Limitation.--A special registration plate under this section may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.20250HB0419PN0394 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Design.--The department shall design and produce the special registration plate under this section to display the Joint Service Achievement Medal, Army Achievement Medal, Navy and Marine Corps Achievement Medal, Air and Space Achievement Medal or Coast Guard Achievement Medal and the words "Joint Service Achievement Medal," "Army Achievement Medal," "Navy and Marine Corps Achievement Medal," "Air and Space Achievement Medal" or "Coast Guard Achievement Medal" at the bottom of each plate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0419PN0394 - 3 - 12345678910